Washington statutes.
RCW 11.106.070

Court to determine accuracy, validity—Decree.

Upon the return date or at some later date fixed by the court if so requested by one or more of the parties, the court without the intervention of a jury and after hearing all the evidence submitted shall determine the correctness of the account and the validity and propriety of all actions of the trustee or trustees set forth in the account including the purchase, retention, and disposition of any of the property and funds of the trust, and shall render its decree either approving or disapproving the account or any part of it, and surcharging the trustee or trustees for all losses, if any, caused by negligent or wilful breaches of trust.

[ 1985 c 30 s 101. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 134; 1955 c 33 s 30.30.070; prior: 1951 c 226 s 7. Formerly RCW 30.30.070.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.